Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5092YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2022 Section 1. Section 321.385, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 321.385 Headlamps on motor vehicles. 3 Every A motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, motorized 4 bicycle, or all-terrain vehicle shall be equipped with at least 5 two headlamps with at least one on each side of the front 6 of the motor vehicle, which headlamps shall comply with the 7 requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter . A 8 headlamp shall not display light that is a color other than 9 white. 10 Sec. 2. Section 321.403, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 321.403 Auxiliary driving lamps. 13 Any A motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed more 14 than three auxiliary driving lamps mounted on the front at a 15 height not less than twelve inches nor more than forty-two 16 inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands, 17 and every such an auxiliary driving lamp or lamps shall meet 18 the requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter . An 19 auxiliary driving lamp shall not display light that is a color 20 other than white. 21